Louisiana, session 2026, HB650.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:6006.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§6006.2. Rebates for local inventory taxes paid
A. There shall be allowed a rebate for local inventory taxes paid by a
taxpayer if he is ineligible for the tax credit provided for in R.S. 47:6006 but has paid
ad valorem taxes to a political subdivision in Louisiana on inventory during the
preceding calendar year.
B. The amount of the rebate shall be calculated in the same manner and at the
same percentage as the tax credit provided for in R.S. 47:6006 based on the amount
of ad valorem taxes paid by the taxpayer to a political subdivision in Louisiana on
inventory for the preceding calendar year.
C. A taxpayer shall not be eligible for a rebate pursuant to this Section if he
received any state tax rebate, credit, exemption, exclusion, or deduction or any other
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1265 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 650
state tax benefit for local inventory taxes paid for which the taxpayer seeks a rebate
provided for in this Section.
D. The Department of Revenue, referred to hereafter in this Section as the
"department", shall process applications for the rebate authorized in this Section. A
taxpayer shall apply for a rebate using the form and in the manner prescribed by the
department no later than June thirtieth of the year following his payment of ad
valorem taxes to a political subdivision in Louisiana on inventory. A taxpayer who
seeks a rebate authorized in this Section shall submit to the secretary of the
department all documentation as the secretary may require by rule for claiming the
rebate. The secretary of the department shall promulgate, in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act, all rules necessary to implement the provisions of this
Section, including rules providing for the form and procedure for claiming a rebate.
E. Rebates previously paid to a taxpayer as authorized by this Section, but
later disallowed, may be recovered by the secretary of the department through any
collection remedy authorized in R.S. 47:1561.2.
F. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the secretary of the
department shall make the rebates authorized in this Section from current collections
of state taxes.
Section 2. The rebate authorized in this Act shall not apply to payments of ad
valorem taxes made prior to January 1, 2026.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.